District of Columbia statutes.
47-368.05

Deposit of revenues dedicated to debt service.

Notwithstanding any other law, excluding funds expressly exempted by the Chief Financial Officer, revenues dedicated by law to specific funds, shall, whenever a portion of those funds is budgeted to pay debt service, first be deposited into the General Fund of the District of Columbia to pay such debt service. After sufficient revenues have been deposited for debt service, any additional revenues shall then be deposited into the specific funds. Any revenues deposited, but unexpended for debt service shall be deposited in the specific funds at the end of the fiscal year.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7004(b), 55 DCR 7598

Short Title

Short title: Section 7003 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle B of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Dedicated Tax and Other Type Revenue Debt Service Support Act of 2008”.